Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 49.2 Identity Theft Protection

11-49.2-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 225, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 138, § 1, effective June 26, 2016; P.L. 2015, ch. 148, § 1, effective July 2, 2016.

11-49.2-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 225, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 138, § 1, effective June 26, 2016; P.L. 2015, ch. 148, § 1, effective July 2, 2016.

11-49.2-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 225, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 138, § 1, effective June 26, 2016; P.L. 2015, ch. 148, § 1, effective July 2, 2016.

11-49.2-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 225, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 138, § 1, effective June 26, 2016; P.L. 2015, ch. 148, § 1, effective July 2, 2016.

11-49.2-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 225, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 138, § 1, effective June 26, 2016; P.L. 2015, ch. 148, § 1, effective July 2, 2016.

11-49.2-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 225, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 138, § 1, effective June 26, 2016; P.L. 2015, ch. 148, § 1, effective July 2, 2016.

11-49.2-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 225, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 138, § 1, effective June 26, 2016; P.L. 2015, ch. 148, § 1, effective July 2, 2016.